Massachusetts, session 194th, S1857.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting in section 3 (g), in line 242, after the word “hospital,” the following new
words:- "employees of the trial court of the Commonwealth who hold the position of court
service coordinator or assistant court service coordinator."
of 1